Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article IV The Judiciary

Section 1. Judicial Power and Jurisdiction.

The judicial power of the State is vested in a supreme court, a superior court, and the courts established by the legislature. The jurisdiction of courts shall be prescribed by law. The courts shall constitute a unified judicial system for operation and administration. Judicial districts shall be established by law.

Section 2. Supreme Court.

The supreme court shall be the highest court of the State, with final appellate jurisdiction. It shall consist of three justices, one of whom is chief justice. The number of justices may be increased by law upon the request of the supreme court.

The chief justice shall be selected from among the justices of the supreme court by a majority vote of the justices. His term of office as chief justice is three years. A justice may serve more than one term as chief justice but he may not serve consecutive terms in that office.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions changing the number of supreme court justices, see AS

22.05.020

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s FCCS SCS CSHJR 11 1970), added subsection (b).

Legislative history reports. —

For report on 1970 House Joint Resolution No. 11 (FCCS SCS CSHJR 11), see 1969 House Journal, p. 427; 1970 House Journal, p. 1388; 1970 Senate Journal, p. 1167.

Section 3. Superior Court.

The superior court shall be the trial court of general jurisdiction and shall consist of five judges. The number of judges may be changed by law.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions changing the number of superior court judges, see AS

22.10.120

.

Section 4. Qualifications of Justices and Judges.

Supreme court justices and superior court judges shall be citizens of the United States and of the State, licensed to practice law in the State, and possessing any additional qualifications prescribed by law. Judges of other courts shall be selected in a manner, for terms, and with qualifications prescribed by law.

Section 5. Nomination and Appointment.

The governor shall fill any vacancy in an office of supreme court justice or superior court judge by appointing one of two or more persons nominated by the judicial council.

Section 6. Approval or Rejection.

Each supreme court justice and superior court judge shall, in the manner provided by law, be subject to approval or rejection on a nonpartisan ballot at the first general election held more than three years after his appointment. Thereafter, each supreme court justice shall be subject to approval or rejection in a like manner every tenth year, and each superior court judge, every sixth year.

Section 7. Vacancy.

The office of any supreme court justice or superior court judge becomes vacant ninety days after the election at which he is rejected by a majority of those voting on the question, or for which he fails to file his declaration of candidacy to succeed himself.

Section 8. Judicial Council.

The judicial council shall consist of seven members. Three attorney members shall be appointed for six-year terms by the governing body of the organized state bar. Three non-attorney members shall be appointed for six-year terms by the governor subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in like manner. Appointments shall be made with due consideration to area representation and without regard to political affiliation. The chief justice of the supreme court shall be ex-officio the seventh member and chairman of the judicial council. No member of the judicial council, except the chief justice, may hold any other office or position of profit under the United States or the State. The judicial council shall act by concurrence of four or more members and according to rules which it adopts.

Section 9. Additional Duties.

The judicial council shall conduct studies for improvement of the administration of justice, and make reports and recommendations to the supreme court and to the legislature at intervals of not more than two years. The judicial council shall perform other duties assigned by law.

Section 10. Commission on Judicial Conduct.

The Commission on Judicial Conduct shall consist of nine members, as follows: three persons who are justices or judges of state courts, elected by the justices and judges of state courts; three members who have practiced law in this state for ten years, appointed by the governor from nominations made by the governing body of the organized bar and subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session; and three persons who are not judges, retired judges, or members of the state bar, appointed by the governor and subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. In addition to being subject to impeachment under Section 12 of this article, a justice or judge may be disqualified from acting as such and may be suspended, removed from office, retired, or censured by the supreme court upon the recommendation of the commission. The powers and duties of the commission and the bases for judicial disqualification shall be established by law.

Cross references. —

For provisions on the powers and duties of the Commission on Judicial Conduct, see AS

22.30.011

; for proceedings when a successful candidate for judicial retention or the campaign treasurer or deputy campaign treasurer of such a candidate has been convicted of a violation of the state election campaign laws, see AS

15.13.380(i)(4)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective October 11, 1968 (5th Legislature’s 2d FCCS SCS CSHJR 74 (1968)) rewrote this section to establish the commission and provide for “disqualification” of judges. Formerly, this section dealt only with incapacity and retirement of judges.

The amendment, effective December 24, 1982 (12th Legislature’s CSHJR 32 (Jud) am S (1981)), substituted “Conduct” for “Qualifications” following “Commission on Judicial,” substituted “three persons who are justices or judges of the state courts” for “one justice of the supreme court” preceding “elected by the justices,” substituted “and judges of the state courts” for “of the supreme court; three judges of the superior court, elected by the judges of the superior court; one judge of the district court, elected by the judges of the district court” following “elected by the justices,” substituted “three” for “two” preceding “members who have practiced law,” added “governor from nominations made by the” preceding “governing body of the organized bar,” added “and subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session” following “governing body of the organized bar” and substituted “three” for “two” preceding “persons who are not judges,”.

Section 11. Retirement.

Justices and judges shall be retired at the age of seventy except as provided in this article. The basis and amount of retirement pay shall be prescribed by law. Retired judges shall render no further service on the bench except for special assignments as provided by court rule.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to judicial retirement, see AS 22.25.

Section 12. Impeachment.

Impeachment of any justice or judge for malfeasance or misfeasance in the performance of his official duties shall be according to procedure prescribed for civil officers.

Section 13. Compensation.

Justices, judges, and members of the judicial council and the Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall receive compensation as prescribed by law. Compensation of justices and judges shall not be diminished during their terms of office, unless by general law applying to all salaried officers of the State.

Revisor’s notes. —

CSHJR 32(Jud) am S (1981), effective December 24, 1982, which changed the “Commission on Judicial Qualifications” to the “Commission on Judicial Conduct” inadvertently omitted express amendment of this section.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 11, 1968 (5th Legislature’s 2d FCCS SCS CSHJR 74 (1968)), inserted “and the Commission on Judicial Qualifications” in the first sentence.

Section 14. Restrictions.

Supreme court justices and superior court judges while holding office may not practice law, hold office in a political party, or hold any other office or position of profit under the United States, the State, or its political subdivisions. Any supreme court justice or superior court judge filing for another elective public office forfeits his judicial position.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The prohibition against dual office holding is literally enforced in Alaska. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

The purpose of the prohibition against dual office holding is to guard against conflicts of interest, self-aggrandizement, concentration of power, and dilution of separation of powers in regard to the exercise of the executive, judicial, and legislative functions of the state government. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Since the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska is not an interbranch commission, a judge may not sit as a regent while holding office. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

A judge does not sit on the Board of Regents in a representative capacity of the judicial branch. When he sits as a regent he is not exercising judicial power but rather certain executive powers of control vested in the regents over the state’s sole institution of higher learning. This he may not do. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

The University Alaska is an instrumentality of the state, and membership on its Board of Regents is necessarily an office under the state. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 15. Rule-Making Power.

The supreme court shall make and promulgate rules governing the administration of all courts. It shall make and promulgate rules governing practice and procedure in civil and criminal cases in all courts. These rules may be changed by the legislature by two-thirds vote of the members elected to each house.

Section 16. Court Administration.

The chief justice of the supreme court shall be the administrative head of all courts. He may assign judges from one court or division thereof to another for temporary service. The chief justice shall, with the approval of the supreme court, appoint an administrative director to serve at the pleasure of the supreme court and to supervise the administrative operations of the judicial system.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning retirement benefits of administrative director, see AS

22.25.012

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s FCCS SCS CSHJR 11 (1970)), substituted “the pleasure of the supreme court” for “his pleasure” in the last sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on 1970 House Joint Resolution No. 11 (FCCS SCS CSHJR 11), see 1969 House Journal, p. 427; 1970 House Journal, p. 1388; 1970 Senate Journal, p. 1167.